src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k12_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    vinur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: vinur
    vinur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: vin
    vinur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: vini
    vinur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: vinar
    vinur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: vinir
    vinur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: vinir
    vinur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: vinum
    vinur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: vina
    vinur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: vinurin
    vinur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: vinin
    vinur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: vininum
    vinur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: vinarins
    vinur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: vinirnir
    vinur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: vinirnar
    vinur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: vinunum
    vinur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: vinanna
